Vermont, session 2025-2026, H296.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. chapter 73 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 73. DIETICIANS
Subchapter 1. General provisions
* * *
Subchapter 2. Dietician Licensure Compact
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 2 of 44
§ 3391. DIETICIAN LICENSURE COMPACT; ADOPTION
This subchapter is the Vermont adoption of the Dietician Licensure
Compact. The form, format, and text of the Compact have been conformed to
the conventions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that this subchapter be interpreted as substantively the same
as the Dietician Licensure Compact that is enacted by other Compact party
states.
§ 3391a. PURPOSE
(a) The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of
dietetics with the goal of improving public access to dietetics services. This
Compact preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect public health
and safety through the current system of State licensure, while also providing
for licensure portability through a compact privilege granted to qualifying
professionals.
(b) This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) increase public access to dietetics services;
(2) provide opportunities for interstate practice by licensed dietitians
who meet uniform requirements;
(3) eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple states;
(4) reduce administrative burden on member states and licensees;
(5) enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 3 of 44
(6) encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate
practice of licensed dietitians;
(7) support relocating active military members and their spouses;
(8) enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information among member states; and
(9) vest all member states with the authority to hold a licensed dietitian
accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient
is located at the time care is rendered.
§ 3391b. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) “ACEND” means the Accreditation Council for Education in
Nutrition and Dietetics or its successor organization.
(2) “Active military member” means any individual with full-time duty
status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
(3) “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing
authority or other authority against a licensee, including actions against an
individual’s license or compact privilege such as revocation, suspension,
probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 4 of 44
any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee’s authorization to
practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
(4) “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process approved by a licensing authority.
(5) “Charter member state” means any member state which enacted this
Compact by law before the effective date specified in section 3391l of this
subchapter.
(6) “Continuing education” means a requirement, as a condition of
license renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of,
educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(7) “CDR” means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its
successor organization.
(8) “Compact Commission” means the government agency whose
membership consists of all states that have enacted this Compact, which is
known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission, as described in
section 3391h of this subchapter, and which shall operate as an instrumentality
of the member states.
(9) “Compact privilege” means a legal authorization, which is
equivalent to a license, permitting the practice of dietetics in a remote state.
(10) “Current significant investigative information” means:
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 5 of 44
(A) investigative information that a licensing authority, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject
licensee to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not
groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
(B) investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of
whether the subject licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to
respond.
(11) “Data system” means a repository of information about licensees,
including, but not limited to, continuing education, examination, licensure,
investigative, compact privilege, and adverse action information.
(12) “Encumbered license” means a license in which an adverse action
restricts a licensee’s ability to practice dietetics.
(13) “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on, a licensee’s full and unrestricted practice of dietetics by a
licensing authority.
(14) “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this
Compact, and the Compact Commission.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 6 of 44
(15) “Home State” means the member state that is the licensee’s primary
state of residence or that has been designated pursuant to section 3391f of this
subchapter.
(16) “Investigative information” means information, records, and
documents received or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an
investigation.
(17) “Jurisprudence requirement” means an assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the state laws and regulations governing the practice
of dietetics in such state.
(18) “License” means an authorization from a member state to either:
(A) engage in the practice of dietetics, including medical nutrition
therapy; or
(B) use the title “dietitian,” “licensed dietitian,” “licensed dietitian
nutritionist,” “certified dietitian,” or other title describing a substantially
similar practitioner as the Compact Commission may further define by rule.
(19) “Licensee” or “licensed dietitian” means an individual who
currently holds a license and who meets all of the requirements outlined in
section 3391d of this subchapter.
(20) “Licensing authority” means the board or agency of a state, or
equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of the practice of
dietetics.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 7 of 44
(21) “Member state” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
(22) “Practice of dietetics” means the synthesis and application of
dietetics as defined by state law and regulations, primarily for the provision of
nutrition care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via
telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and
promote wellness.
(23) “Registered dietitian” means a person who:
(A) has completed applicable education, experience, examination,
and recertification requirements approved by CDR;
(B) is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered
dietitian nutritionist; and
(C) is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or
registered dietitian nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations “RD” or
“RDN.”
(24) “Remote state” means a member state, other than the home state,
where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a compact privilege.
(25) “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the Compact
Commission that has the force of law.
(26) “Single state license” means a license issued by a member state
within the issuing state and does not include a compact privilege in any other
member state.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 8 of 44
(27) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the
United States of America.
(28) “Unencumbered License” means a license that authorizes a licensee
to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of dietetics.
§ 3391c. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
(a) To participate in the Compact, a state must currently:
(1) license and regulate the practice of dietetics; and
(2) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about licensees.
(b) A member state shall:
(1) Participate fully in the Compact Commission’s data system,
including using the unique identifier as defined in rules.
(2) Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of current
significant investigative information regarding a licensee.
(3) Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history
record information of applicants for an initial compact privilege. These
procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-
based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s
criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 9 of 44
(A) A member state must fully implement a criminal history record
information requirement, within a time frame established by rule, which
includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record
search and shall use those results in determining compact privilege eligibility.
(B) Communication between a member state and the Compact
Commission or among member states regarding the verification of eligibility
for a compact privilege shall not include any information received from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal history record
information check performed by a member state.
(4) Comply with and enforce the rules of the Compact Commission.
(5) Require an applicant for a compact privilege to obtain or retain a
license in the licensee’s home state and meet the home state’s qualifications for
licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable state laws.
(6) Recognize a compact privilege granted to a licensee who meets all of
the requirements outlined in section 3391d of this subchapter in accordance
with the terms of the Compact and rules.
(c) Member states may set and collect a fee for granting a compact
privilege.
(d) Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to
apply for a member state’s single state license as provided under the laws of
each member state. However, the single state license granted to these
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 10 of 44
individuals shall not be recognized as granting a compact privilege to engage
in the practice of dietetics in any other member state.
(e) Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single state license.
(f) At no point shall the Compact Commission have the power to define the
requirements for the issuance of a single state license to practice dietetics. The
member states shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these
requirements.
§ 3391d. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
(a) To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the
Compact, the licensee shall:
(1) satisfy one of the following:
(A) hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right
to use the term registered dietitian; or
(B) complete all of the following:
(i) an education program which is either:
(I) a master’s degree or doctoral degree that is
programmatically accredited by ACEND, or a dietetics accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education, which the Compact
Commission may by rule determine, and from a college or university
accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate regional accrediting
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 11 of 44
agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education Accreditation and the
United States Department of Education; or
(II) an academic degree from a college or university in a
foreign country equivalent to the degree described in subdivision (1)(B)(i)(I) of
this subsection (a) that is programmatically accredited by ACEND, or a
dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education, which the Compact Commission may by rule determine;
(ii) a planned, documented, supervised practice experience in
dietetics that is programmatically accredited by ACEND, or a dietetics
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education
which the Compact Commission may by rule determine and which involves at
least 1,000 hours of practice experience under the supervision of a registered
dietitian or a licensed dietitian; and
(iii) successful completion of either the Registration Examination
for Dietitians administered by CDR or a national credentialing examination for
dietitians approved by the Compact Commission by rule; such completion
being no more than five years prior to the date of the licensee’s application for
initial licensure and accompanied by a period of continuous licensure
thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the rules of the Compact
Commission;
(2) hold an unencumbered license in the home state;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 12 of 44
(3) notify the Compact Commission that the licensee is seeking a
compact privilege within a remote state;
(4) pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact
privilege;
(5) meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state
in which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and
(6) report to the Compact Commission any adverse action,
encumbrance, or restriction on a license taken by any non-member state within
30 days from the date the action is taken.
(b) The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home
state license. To maintain a compact privilege, renewal of the compact
privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the home state license as the
Compact Commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section to maintain the compact privilege
in the remote state.
(c) A licensee exercising a compact privilege shall adhere to the laws and
regulations of the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for educating
themselves on, and complying with, any and all state laws relating to the
practice of dietetics in such remote state.
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this Compact or
state law, a licensee exercising a compact privilege shall not be required to
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 13 of 44
complete continuing education requirements required by a remote state. A
licensee exercising a compact privilege is only required to meet any continuing
education requirements as required by the home state.
§ 3391e. OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A
COMPACT PRIVILEGE
(a) A licensee may hold a home state license, which allows for a compact
privilege in other member states, in only one member state at a time.
(b) If a licensee changes home state by moving between two member
states:
(1) The licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new home state
license based on a compact privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the
current and new home state in accordance with the rules of the Compact
Commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state
license by virtue of a compact privilege, the new home state shall verify that
the licensee meets the criteria in section 3391d of this subchapter via the data
system and require that the licensee complete the following:
(A) Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal
history record information check;
(B) any other criminal history record information required by the new
home state; and
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 14 of 44
(C) any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
(3) The former home state shall convert the former home state license
into a compact privilege once the new home state has activated the new home
state license in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Compact
Commission.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if the licensee
cannot meet the criteria in section 3391d of this subchapter, the new home
state may apply its requirements for issuing a new single state license.
(5) The licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new home state in
order to be issued a new home state license.
(c) If a licensee changes their state of residence by moving from a member
state to a non-member state, or from a non-member state to a member state, the
state criteria shall apply for issuance of a single state license in the new state.
(d) Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold
a single state license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of this
Compact, a licensee shall have only one home state license.
(e) Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single state license.
§ 3391f. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member, or their spouse, shall designate a home state
where the individual has a current license in good standing. The individual
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 15 of 44
may retain the home state designation during the period the service member is
on active duty.
§ 3391g. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state
shall have the authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
(1) take adverse action against a licensee’s compact privilege within that
member state; and
(2) issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the attendance
and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another member
state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in
proceedings pending before that court. The issuing authority shall pay any
witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
(b) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against
a licensee’s home state license.
(c) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the
same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 16 of 44
would if the conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the
home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.
(d) The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a licensee
who changes home states during the course of the investigations. The home
state shall also have authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly
report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the data
system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the new
home state of any adverse actions.
(e) A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from
the affected licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee.
(f) A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of
another remote state, provided that the member state follows its own
procedures for taking the adverse action.
(g) Joint investigations.
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its
respective state law, any member state may participate with other member
states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the Compact.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 17 of 44
(h) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s home
state license resulting in an encumbrance on the home state license, the
licensee’s compact privilege in all other member states shall be revoked until
all encumbrances have been removed from the home state license. All home
state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a licensee shall
include a statement that the licensee’s compact privileges are revoked in all
member states during the pendency of the order.
(i) Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to an
unencumbered license, as certified by the home state’s licensing authority, the
licensee must meet the requirements of subsection 3391d(a) of this subchapter
and follow the administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a compact
privilege in any remote state.
(j) If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the
administrator of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall
promptly notify the other member states state of any adverse actions.
(k) Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s decision that
participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
§ 3391h. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE
COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) The Compact member states hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all member states that have
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 18 of 44
enacted the Compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission.
The Compact Commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting
jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state. The Compact Commission
shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set
forth in section 3391l of this subchapter.
(b) Membership, voting, and meetings.
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate selected
by that member state’s licensing authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the licensing
authority or their designee.
(3) The Compact Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of
office for delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension
of any delegate from office.
(5) A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its
delegate occurring on the Compact Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the
Compact Commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
(7) Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the
bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in person or
by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 19 of 44
(8) The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws.
The Compact Commission may meet in person or by telecommunication, video
conference, or other means of communication.
(c) The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
(2) establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) establish and amend rules and bylaws;
(4) maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of
this Compact, the Compact Commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
(6) initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any licensing authority to
sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) maintain and certify records and information provided to a member
state as the authenticated business records of the Compact Commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the Compact Commission’s behalf;
(8) purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but
not limited to, employees of a member state;
(10) conduct an annual financial review;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 20 of 44
(11) hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define
duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of
the Compact, and establish the Compact Commission’s personnel policies and
programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other
related personnel matters;
(12) assess and collect fees;
(13) accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Compact
Commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of impropriety or conflict of
interest;
(14) lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) borrow money;
(18) appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact or the bylaws;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 21 of 44
(19) provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
(20) establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a
vice chair;
(21) determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different
from the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the Compact; and
(22) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this Compact.
(d) The Executive Committee.
(1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Compact Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The
powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
(A) oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact, including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
Compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(B) recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the rules or
bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to compact member
states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
(C) ensure compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 22 of 44
(D) prepare and recommend the budget;
(E) maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact
Commission;
(F) monitor Compact compliance of member states and provide
compliance reports to the Compact Commission;
(G) establish additional committees as necessary;
(H) exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission
during the interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any
other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by
rule or bylaw; and
(I) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Compact
Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
(A) the chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee;
(B) five voting members from the current membership of the
Compact Commission, elected by the Compact Commission;
(C) one ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
professional association representing dietitians; and
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 23 of 44
(D) one ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national
credentialing organization for dietitians.
(3) The Compact Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in the Compact Commission’s bylaws.
(4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
(A) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public,
except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting
as provided in subdivision (f)(2) of this section.
(B) The Executive Committee shall give 30 days’ notice of its
meetings, posted on the website of the Compact Commission and as
determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the
Compact Commission.
(C) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in
accordance with subdivision (f)(1)(b) of this section.
(e) The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the member states
an annual report.
(f) Meetings of the Compact Commission.
(1) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact
Commission may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in
subdivision (f)(2) of this section.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 24 of 44
(A) Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission
shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions
in section 3391j of this subchapter, except that the Compact Commission may
hold a special meeting as provided in subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this section.
(B) The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it
must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 24 hours’ notice to all
member states, on the Compact Commission’s website, and other means as
provided in the Compact Commission’s rules. The Compact Commission’s
legal counsel shall certify that the Compact Commission’s need to meet
qualifies as an emergency.
(2) The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic
meeting for the Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other
committees of the Compact Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(A) noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the
Compact;
(B) the employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters,
practices, or procedures related to specific employees;
(C) current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Compact
Commission or by a member state’s licensing authority;
(D) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 25 of 44
(E) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
(F) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(G) trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
(H) information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(I) investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(J) information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the Compact Commission or other committee charged
with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues
pursuant to the Compact;
(K) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
member state law; or
(L) other matters as specified in the rules of the Compact
Commission.
(3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer
shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant
exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
(4) The Compact Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 26 of 44
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of
the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of
the Compact Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(g) Financing of the Compact Commission.
(1) The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of,
the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
(2) The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources as provided in subdivision (c)(13) of this section.
(3) The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member
states to whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of the operations
and activities of the Compact Commission and its staff, which must, in a total
amount, be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based upon a formula
that the Compact Commission shall promulgate by rule.
(4) The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Compact
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 27 of 44
Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with
the authority of the member state.
(5) The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Compact Commission shall be subject to an annual financial
review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the
financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of
the Compact Commission.
(h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused
by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred, within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 28 of 44
that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
(2) The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Compact
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
Compact Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or alleged
act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct.
(3) The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the
Compact Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 29 of 44
occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of
any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise
abrogate a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative
defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or
any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the member states or by the Compact Commission.
§ 3391i. DATA SYSTEM
(a) The Compact Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated data system.
(b) The Compact Commission shall assign each applicant for a compact
privilege a unique identifier, as determined by the rules.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the rules of the
Compact Commission, including:
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 30 of 44
(1) identifying information;
(2) licensure data;
(3) adverse actions against a license or compact privilege and
information related thereto;
(4) nonconfidential information related to alternative program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other
information related to such participation not made confidential under member
state law;
(5) any denial of application for licensure, and the reason for such
denial;
(6) the presence of current significant investigative information; and
(7) other information that may facilitate the administration of this
Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the
Compact Commission.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to
this Compact or through the data system, when certified by the Compact
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the Compact Commission and shall be entitled to any associated
hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative
proceedings in a member state.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 31 of 44
(e) Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in
any member state will only be available to other member states.
(f) It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action
against a licensee and to monitor the data system to determine whether any
adverse action has been taken against a licensee. Adverse action information
pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any other
member state.
(g) Member states contributing information to the data system may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
(h) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing
the information shall be removed from the data system.
§ 3391j. RULEMAKING
(a) The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because
the Compact Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that
is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 32 of 44
(b) The rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law in
each member state, provided however that where the rules conflict with the
laws or regulations of a member state that relate to the procedures, actions, and
processes a licensed dietitian is permitted to undertake in that state and the
circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the rules of the Compact Commission shall be ineffective in that
state to the extent of the conflict.
(c) The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted
thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day following adoption or as of
the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or
portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner
used to adopt the Compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Compact
Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Compact Commission shall
hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 33 of 44
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the Compact Commission, and
at least thirty days in advance of the meeting at which the Compact
Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the Compact
Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
(1) on the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
(2) to persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission’s
notices of proposed rulemaking; and
(3) in such other way(s) as the Compact Commission may by rule
specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Compact Commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Compact
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
(2) if the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or
other means of communication, the Compact Commission shall include the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) the text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore;
(4) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested
person; and
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 34 of 44
(5) the manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in response to
the proposed rule shall be available to the public.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing
on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Compact
Commission at hearings required by this section.
(k) The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take
final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full
text of the rule.
(1) The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons
for substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this
section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 35 of 44
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact Commission
may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours’ notice, with
opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in the Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the
rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety days after the
effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency
rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) prevent a loss of Compact Commission or member state funds;
(3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
(4) protect public health and safety.
(m) The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revision to a previously adopted rule for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the
website of the Compact Commission. The revision shall be subject to
challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material
change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Compact Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 36 of 44
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is
challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Compact Commission.
(n) No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
§ 3391k. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) Oversight.
(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each
member state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement this Compact.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and
judicial proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
office of the Compact Commission is located. The Compact Commission may
waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall
affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a
licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
(3) The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the
Compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 37 of 44
purposes. Failure to provide the Compact Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Compact Commission, this Compact,
or promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(1) If the Compact Commission determines that a member state has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this
Compact or the promulgated rules, the Compact Commission shall provide
written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the
default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Compact Commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other member states.
(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred on that state by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date
of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after
all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 38 of 44
to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Compact Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature,
the defaulting state’s licensing authority, and each of the member states’
licensing authority.
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this Compact, that
state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such
termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all compact
privileges granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six months after
the date of said notice of termination.
(g) The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that
is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless
agreed upon in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting
state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Compact Commission
by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Compact Commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 39 of 44
(i) Dispute Resolution.
(1) Upon request by a member state, the Compact Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among member
states and between member and non-member States.
(2) The Compact Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j) Enforcement.
(1) By supermajority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate legal
action against a member state in default in the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has
its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief
and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
Compact Commission. The Compact Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
(2) A member state may initiate legal action against the Compact
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Compact Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 40 of 44
rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(3) No party other than a member state shall enforce this Compact
against the Compact Commission.
§ 3391l. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Compact
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven
member states (“charter member states”) to determine if the statute enacted by
each such charter member state is materially different than the model compact
statute.
(A) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in section 3391k of this subchapter.
(B) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is
terminated, or withdraws from the Compact, the Compact Commission shall
remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
of member states should be less than seven.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 41 of 44
(2) Member states enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial
charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision
3391h(c)(21) of this subchapter to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the
effective date of the Compact or the Compact Commission coming into
existence shall be considered to be actions of the Compact Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Compact Commission.
(4) Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the Compact
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the Compact
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact
becomes law in that state.
(b) Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(1) A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 42 of 44
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a
state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees
within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all compact
privileges granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of 180 days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
(c) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or
prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions
of this Compact.
(d) This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment
to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state
until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
§ 3391m. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
(a) This Compact and the Compact Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 43 of 44
Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not
be construed to limit the Compact Commission’s rulemaking authority solely
for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is
held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of
the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Compact
Commission may deny a state’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance
with the requirements of subsection 3391k(b) of this subchapter, terminate a
member state’s participation in the Compact, if it determines that a
constitutional requirement of a member state is a material departure from the
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in full force and
effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the
member state affected as to all severable matters.
VT LEG #378692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.296
2025 Page 44 of 44
§ 3391n. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law
of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member
state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
(c) All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
member states are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378692 v.1